Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Part III Registration of Securities

7-11-301.
Registration requirement.

A person may not offer to sell or sell a security in this state unless the security:

Is registered under this chapter;

The security or transaction is exempt under this chapter; or

It is a federal covered security.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 69, § 1.

7-11-302.
Registration by filing.

Securities for which a registration statement has been filed under the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq., in connection with the offering of the securities, may be registered by filing, whether or not they are also eligible for registration under §

7-11-303

or §

7-11-304

, if the following conditions are satisfied:

The issuer is organized under the laws of the United States or a state or, if the issuer is not organized under the laws of the United States or a state, it has appointed a duly authorized agent in the United States for service of process;

The issuer has actively engaged in business operations in the United States for a period of at least thirty-six (36) consecutive calendar months immediately before the filing of the federal registration statement;

The issuer has registered a class of equity securities under § 12(b) or 12(g) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. §§ 78l(b) or (g), which class of securities is held of record by five hundred (500) or more persons;

The issuer has:

A total net worth of four million dollars ($4,000,000); or

A total net worth of two million dollars ($2,000,000) and net, pretax income from operations before allowances for extraordinary items, for at least two (2) of the three (3) preceding fiscal years;

Not less than four hundred thousand (400,000) units of the class of security registered under § 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. § 78l, held by the public, excluding securities held by officers and directors of the issuer, underwriters, and persons beneficially owning ten percent (10%) or more of that class of security; and

Outstanding warrants and options held by the underwriters and executive officers and directors of the issuer in an amount not exceeding ten percent (10%) of the total number of shares to be outstanding after completion of the offering of the securities being registered;

The issuer has been subject to the requirements of § 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 and has filed all the material required to be filed under §§ 13 and 14 of that Act, 15 U.S.C. §§ 78m and 78n, for at least thirty-six (36) calendar months immediately before the filing of the federal registration statement and the issuer has filed in a timely manner all reports required to be filed during the twelve (12) calendar months immediately before the filing of the federal registration statement;

For a period of at least thirty (30) days during the three (3) months preceding the offering of the securities registered, there have been at least four (4) market makers for the class of equity securities registered under § 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934;

Each of the underwriters participating in the offering of the securities, and each broker-dealer who will offer the securities in this state, is a member of, or is subject to the rules of fair practice of, a national association of securities dealers with respect to the offering, and the underwriters have contracted to purchase the securities offered in a principal capacity;

The aggregate commissions or discounts to be received by the underwriters will not exceed ten percent (10%) of the aggregate price at which the securities being registered are offered to the public;

Neither the issuer, nor any of its subsidiaries, since the end of the last fiscal year preceding the filing of the registration statement, have:

Failed to pay a dividend or sinking-fund installment on preferred stock;

Defaulted on indebtedness for borrowed money; or

Defaulted on the rental of one or more long-term leases; which defaults in the aggregate are material to the financial position of the issuer and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole; and

In the case of equity securities, the price at which the securities will be offered to the public is not less than five dollars ($5.00) per share.

A registration statement under this section must contain the following information and be accompanied by the following documents, in addition to the information specified in §

7-11-305(c)

and the consent to service of process required by §

7-11-708

:

A statement demonstrating eligibility for registration by filing;

The name, address, and form of organization of the issuer;

With respect to a person on whose behalf a part of the offering is to be made in a nonissuer distribution: name and address; the amount of securities of the issuer held by the person as of the date of the filing of the registration statement; and a statement of the reasons for making the offering;

A description of the securities being registered; and

A copy of the latest prospectus filed with the registration statement under, and satisfying the requirements of, § 10 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77j.

If the information and documents required to be filed by subsection (b) have been on file with the director for at least five (5) business days, or any shorter period as the director allows by rule or order, and the applicable registration fee has been paid before the effectiveness of the federal registration statement, a registration statement under this section automatically becomes effective concurrently with the effectiveness of the federal registration statement. If the federal registration statement becomes effective before the conditions in this subsection are satisfied and they are not waived, the registration statement becomes effective when the conditions are satisfied. The registrant shall promptly notify the director by telephone or electronic mail of the date and time when the federal registration statement becomes effective, and any content of the price amendment, and shall promptly file a post-effective amendment containing the information and documents in the price amendment. The director shall promptly acknowledge receipt of notification and effectiveness of the registration statement as of the date and time the registration statement became effective with the Securities and Exchange Commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch 69, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 159, § 1.

7-11-303.
Registration by coordination.

Securities for which a registration statement has been filed under the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq., in connection with the offering of the securities, may be registered by coordination.

A registration statement under this section contains the following information and is accompanied by the following documents, in addition to the information specified in §

7-11-305(c)

and the consent to service of process required by §

7-11-708

:

An electronically filed copy or paper copy of the latest form of prospectus filed under the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq.;

If the director requires by rule or order: a copy of the articles of incorporation and bylaws or their substantial equivalents, currently in effect; a copy of any agreement with or among underwriters; a copy of an indenture or other instrument governing the issuance of the securities to be registered; and a specimen, copy, or description of the securities;

If the director requests, and subject to §

7-11-703(b)(2)

, any other information, or copies of any other document, filed under the Securities Act of 1933; and

An undertaking to forward promptly, and not later than the first business day after the day they are forwarded to or filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission, all future amendments to the federal registration statement and/or prospectus, other than an amendment that delays the effective date of the registration statement.

A registration statement under this section automatically becomes effective when the federal registration statement becomes effective if all the following conditions are satisfied:

No stop order is in effect and no proceeding is pending under §

7-11-306

;

The registration statement has been on file with the director for at least ten (10) days, or any shorter period the director specifies by rule or order, but if the registration statement is not filed with the director within ten (10) days after the initial filing under the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq., the registration statement has been on file with the director for thirty (30) days, or any shorter period the director specifies by rule or order; and

A statement of the maximum and minimum proposed offering prices and the maximum underwriting discounts and commission has been on file for two (2) full business days, or any shorter period the director specifies by rule or order, and the offering is made within those limitations.

The registrant shall promptly notify the director by telephone or electronic mail of the date and time when the federal registration statement became effective, and any content of the price amendment, and shall promptly file a post-effective amendment containing the information and documents in the price amendment.

Upon failure to receive the required notification and post-effective amendment with respect to the price amendment, the director may enter a stop order, without notice or hearing, retroactively denying effectiveness to the registration statement or suspending its effectiveness until the registrant complies with subsection (d). The director shall promptly notify the registrant by telephone or electronic mail, and promptly confirm by letter or electronic mail if the director notifies by telephone, of the issuance of the order. If the registrant proves compliance with the requirements of subsection (d) as to notice and post-effective amendment, the stop order is void as of its entry.

The director may waive by rule or order either or both of the conditions specified in subsections (c)(2) and (c)(3).

If the federal registration statement becomes effective before all the conditions in subsection (c) are satisfied and they are not waived, the registration statement automatically becomes effective when all the conditions are satisfied. If the registrant advises the director of the date when the federal registration statement is expected to become effective, the director shall promptly advise the registrant by telephone or electronic mail whether all the conditions are satisfied and whether the director then contemplates the institution of a proceeding under §

7-11-306

; but the advice by the director does not preclude the institution of a proceeding for a stop order suspending the effectiveness of the registration statement. A stop order issued under this subsection is not retroactive.

The director may waive or modify, by rule or order, the application of a requirement of this section if a provision of an amendment, repeal, or other alteration of the securities registration provisions of the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq., or the regulations adopted under that act, render the waiver or modification appropriate for further coordination of state and federal registration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 159, § 1.

7-11-304.
Registration by qualification.

A security may be registered by qualification.

A registration statement under this section contains the following information and is accompanied by the following documents in addition to the information specified in §

7-11-305(c)

and the consent to service of process required by §

7-11-708

:

With respect to the issuer and any significant subsidiary: its name, address, and form of organization; the state or foreign jurisdiction and date of its organization; the general character and location of its business; a description of its physical property and equipment; and a statement of the general competitive conditions in the industry or business in which it is or will be engaged;

With respect to every director and officer of the issuer, or person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions: name, address, and principal occupation for the last five (5) years; the amount of securities of the issuer held by the person as of a specified date within thirty (30) days before the filing of the registration statement, the amount of the securities covered by the registration statement to which the person has indicated an intention to subscribe; and a description of any material interest in any material transaction with the issuer or a significant subsidiary effected within the last three (3) years or proposed to be effected;

With respect to persons covered by subsection (b)(2): the compensation paid or given, directly or indirectly, during the last twelve (12) months and estimated to be paid during the next twelve (12) months, by the issuer, together with all predecessors, parents, subsidiaries, and affiliates, to all those persons in the aggregate;

With respect to a person owning of record, or beneficially if known, ten percent (10%) or more of the outstanding shares of a class of equity security of the issuer: the information specified in subsection (b)(2) other than occupation;

With respect to a promoter if the issuer was organized within the last three (3) years: the information specified in subsection (b)(2), the amount paid to the person within that period or intended to be paid, and the consideration for the payment;

With respect to a person on whose behalf a part of the offering is to be made in a nonissuer distribution: name and address; the amount of securities of the issuer held by the person as of the date of the filing of the registration statement; a description of any material interest in any material transaction with the issuer or any significant subsidiary effected within the last three (3) years or proposed to be effected; and a statement of the reasons for making the offering;

The capitalization and long-term debt, on both a current and pro forma basis, of the issuer and any significant subsidiary, including a description of each security outstanding or being registered or otherwise offered, and a statement of the amount and kind of consideration, whether in the form of cash, physical assets, services, patents, goodwill, or anything else, for which the issuer or a subsidiary has issued its securities within the last two (2) years or is obligated to issue its securities;

The kind and amount of securities to be offered; the proposed offering price or the method by which it is to be computed; any variation from the proposed offering price at which a proportion of the offering is to be made to a person or class of persons other than the underwriters, with a specification of the person or class; the basis upon which the offering is to be made if other than for cash; the estimated aggregate underwriting and selling discounts or commissions and finders’ fees, including separately cash, securities, contracts, or anything else of value to accrue to the underwriters or finders in connection with the offering, or, if the selling discounts or commissions are variable, the basis of determining them and their maximum and minimum amounts; the estimated amounts of other selling expenses, including legal, engineering, and accounting charges; the name and address of every underwriter and every recipient of a finder’s fee; a copy of any underwriting or selling group agreement pursuant to which the distribution is to be made, or the proposed form of the agreement whose terms have not yet been determined; and a description of the plan of distribution of securities that are to be offered otherwise than through an underwriter;

The estimated cash proceeds to be received by the issuer from the offering; the purposes for which the proceeds are to be used by the issuer; the amount to be used for each purpose; the order or priority in which the proceeds will be used for the purposes stated; the amount of funds to be raised from other sources to achieve the purposes stated; the sources of the funds; and, if part of the proceeds is to be used to acquire property, including goodwill, other than in the ordinary course of business, the names and addresses of the vendors, the purchase price, the names of the persons who have received commissions in connection with the acquisition, and the amounts of commissions and any other expense in connection with the acquisition, including the cost of borrowing money to finance the acquisition;

A description of the stock options or other security options outstanding, or to be created in connection with the offering, and the amount of the options held or to be held by every person required to be named in subsection (b)(2), (b)(4), (b)(5), (b)(6), or (b)(8) and by a person who holds or will hold ten percent (10%) or more in the aggregate of the options;

The dates of, parties to, and general effect concisely stated of, every management or other material contract made or to be made other than in the ordinary course of business if it is to be performed in whole or in part at or after the filing of the registration statement or was made within the last two (2) years; and a copy of the contract;

A description of pending litigation or proceedings to which the issuer is a party and that materially affect its business or assets, including any litigation or proceeding known to be contemplated by a governmental authority;

A copy of any prospectus, pamphlet, circular, form letter, advertisement, or other sales literature intended as of the effective date to be used in connection with the offering;

A specimen, copy, or description of the securities being registered; a copy of the issuer’s articles of incorporation and bylaws, or their substantial equivalents, as currently in effect; and a copy of any indenture or other instrument covering the securities to be registered;

A signed or conformed copy of an opinion of counsel as to the legality of the securities being registered, with an English translation if it is in a foreign language, which states whether the securities when sold will be legally issued, fully paid, and nonassessable, and, if debt securities, a binding obligation of the issuer;

The written consent of an accountant, engineer, appraiser, or other person whose profession gives authority to a statement made by the person, if the person is named as having prepared or certified a report or valuation, other than a public and official document or statement, which is used in connection with the registration statement;

A statement of financial condition of the issuer as of a date within four (4) months before the filing of the registration statement; a statement of results of operations and analysis of surplus for each of the three (3) fiscal years before the date of the statement of financial condition and for any period between the close of the last fiscal year and the date of the statement of financial condition, or for the period of the issuer’s and any predecessors’ existence if less than three (3) years; and, if part of the proceeds of the offering is to be applied to the purchase of a business, the same financial statements that would be required if the business were the registrant; and

Any additional information the director specifies by rule or order.

Simplified registration for small businesses.

For purposes of simplifying the registration statement for smaller offerings and promoting uniformity with other states, the director may adopt a form to be used as the registration statement for securities being registered under this section and sold in offerings in which the aggregate offering price does not exceed a maximum amount which the director may determine. The form need not require all the information included in this section and may require information not included in this section. The director at his or her discretion may also provide for expedited consideration or automatic approval of small offerings exempt from registration with the Securities and Exchange Commission under 15 U.S.C. § 77c(b) which have been approved by another state with a review process substantially equivalent to the review process of the director provided that the other state agrees to provide similar expedited consideration or automatic approval to securities of Rhode Island issuers.

The maximum amount that may be raised under the simplified registration procedures authorized by this subsection (c) does not exceed the aggregate offering price in Regulation D, Rule 230.504, or Regulation A, Rule 230.254 of the Securities Act of 1933 rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission, or successor rules, whichever aggregate offering price is greater.

An issuer listed in this subsection (c)(3) is not eligible to file applications for simplified registration under subsection (c):

Investment companies subject to the federal Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq.

An issuer subject to the reporting requirements of § 13 or 15(d) of the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. § 78m or 78o(d).

An issuer seeking to register securities for sale by persons other than the issuer.

An issuer subject to any of the disqualifications described in Regulation A, Rule 230.252, subsections (c), (d), and (e) of the Securities Act of 1933 rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission, or subject to any of the actions described in §

7-11-212(b)(3)

through (b)(7). For purposes of this subsection (c)(3)(iv), an issuer includes an issuer’s director, officer, ten percent shareholder, promoter or selling agent of the securities to be offered or any officer, director, or partner of the selling agent. The director for good cause shown may waive the provisions of this subsection (c)(3)(iv).

Only an issuer organized as a corporation is eligible for simplified registration under subsection (c).

A registration statement under this section becomes effective thirty (30) calendar days, or any shorter period as the director specifies by rule or order, after the date the registration statement or the last amendment other than a price amendment is filed, if:

No stop order is in effect and no proceeding is pending under §

7-11-306

;

The director has not ordered under subsection (e) that effectiveness be delayed; and

The registrant has not requested that effectiveness be delayed.

The director may delay effectiveness for a single period of not more than ninety (90) days if the director determines the registration statement is not complete in all material respects and promptly notifies the registrant of that determination.

The director may delay effectiveness for a single period of not more than thirty (30) days if the director determines that the delay is necessary, whether or not the director previously delayed effectiveness under subsection (e)(1).

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 247, § 1.

7-11-305.
Provisions applicable to registration generally.

A registration statement may be filed by the issuer, any other person on whose behalf the offering is to be made, or a registered broker-dealer.

A person filing a registration statement shall pay a nonrefundable fee of one-tenth of one percent (0.1%) of the maximum aggregate offering price at which the registered securities are to be offered in this state, but not less than three hundred dollars ($300) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

A registration statement must specify the amount of securities to be offered in this state and the states in which a registration statement or similar document in connection with the offering has been or is to be filed and any adverse order, judgment, or decree entered by the securities agency or administrator in any state or by a court or the Securities and Exchange Commission in connection with the offering.

A document filed under this chapter or a predecessor act within five (5) years before the filing of a registration statement may be incorporated by reference in the registration statement if the document is currently accurate.

The director may permit by rule or order the omission of any item of information or document from a registration statement.

In the case of a nonissuer offering, the director may not require information under subsection (m) or §

7-11-304

unless it is known to the person filing the registration statement or to the person on whose behalf the offering is to be made, or can be furnished by the person without unreasonable effort or expense.

In the case of a registration under §

7-11-303

or §

7-11-304

by an issuer who has no public market for its shares or no significant earnings from continuing operations during the last five (5) years, or any shorter period of its existence, the director may require by rule or order as a condition of registration that the following securities be deposited in escrow for not more than three (3) years:

Securities issued to a promoter within the three (3) years immediately before the offering or to be issued to a promoter for a consideration substantially less than the offering price; and

Securities issued to a promoter for a consideration other than cash, unless the registrant demonstrates that the value of the non-cash consideration received in exchange for the securities is substantially equal to the offering price for the securities.

The director may determine by rule or order the conditions of an escrow required under subsection (g), but the director may not reject a depository solely because of location in another state.

The director may require by rule or order as a condition of registration under §

7-11-303

or §

7-11-304

that the proceeds from the sale of the registered securities in this state be impounded until the issuer receives a specified amount from the sale of the securities. The director may by rule or order determine the conditions of an impound arrangement required under this subsection, but the director may not reject a depository solely because of location in another state.

If securities are registered under §

7-11-302

or §

7-11-303

, the prospectus filed under the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq., must be delivered to each purchaser in accordance with the prospectus delivery requirements of the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq.

If securities are registered under §

7-11-304

, an offering document containing information the director designates by rule or order must be delivered to each purchaser with or before the earliest of:

The first written offer to sell made to the purchaser by or for the account of the issuer or another person on whose behalf the offering is being made, or by an underwriter or broker-dealer who is offering part of an unsold allotment or subscription taken by it as a participant in the distribution;

Confirmation of a sale made by or for the account of a person named in subsection (k)(1);

Payment pursuant to a sale; or

Delivery pursuant to a sale.

A registration statement remains effective for one year after its effective date unless the director extends the period of effectiveness by rule or order. All outstanding securities of the same class as the registered securities are considered to be registered for the purpose of a nonissuer transaction while the registration statement is effective, unless the director, by rule or order, provides otherwise. A registration statement may not be withdrawn after its effective date if any of the securities registered have been sold in this state, unless the director, by rule or order, provides otherwise. No registration statement is effective while a stop order is in effect under §

7-11-306(a)

.

During the period that an offering is being made pursuant to an effective registration statement, the director may require by rule or order the person who filed the registration statement to file reports not more often than quarterly to keep reasonably current the information contained in the registration statement and to disclose the progress of the offering.

A registration statement filed under §

7-11-302

or

7-11-303

may be amended after its effective date to increase the securities specified being offered and sold. The amendment becomes effective upon filing of the amendment and payment of an additional filing fee, calculated in the manner specified in subsection (b), with respect to the additional securities to be offered and sold. The effectiveness of the amendment relates back to the date of sale of the additional securities being registered.

A registration statement filed under §

7-11-304

may be amended after its effective date to increase the securities specified to be offered and sold, if the public offering price and underwriters’ discounts and commissions are not changed from the respective amounts of which the director was informed. The amendment becomes effective when the director so orders and relates back to the date of sale of the additional securities being registered. A person filing an amendment pays an additional filing fee equal to two (2) times the fee otherwise payable, calculated in the manner specified in subsection (b), regarding the additional securities to be offered and sold.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 24, § 1.

7-11-306.
Denial, suspension, and revocation of registration.

The director may issue a stop order denying effectiveness to, or suspending or revoking the effectiveness of, a registration statement if the director finds:

That the order is in the public interest; and

That:

The registration statement as of the effective date or as of the proposed effective date in the case of an order denying effectiveness, an amendment under §

7-11-305(n)

or

7-11-305(o)

as of its effective date, or a report under §

7-11-305(m)

contains any untrue statement of material fact or omits to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading;

This chapter or a rule, order, or condition lawfully imposed under this chapter has been willfully violated, in connection with the offering, by the person filing the registration statement; by the issuer, a partner, officer, or director of the issuer, a person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions, or a person directly or indirectly controlling or controlled by the issuer, but only if the person filing the registration statement is directly or indirectly controlled by or acting for the issuer; or by an underwriter;

The security registered or sought to be registered is the subject of a permanent or temporary injunction of a court of competent jurisdiction or an administrative stop order or similar order entered under any other federal or state law applicable to the offering; but the director may not institute a proceeding against an effective registration statement under this subsection (a)(2)(iii) more than one year after the date of the order or injunction relied on, and the director may not enter an order under this subsection (a)(2)(iii) on the basis of an order or injunction entered under the securities act of another state unless the order or injunction was based on facts that currently would constitute a ground for a stop order under this section;

The issuer’s enterprise or method of business includes or would include activities that are illegal where performed;

A security sought to be registered under §

7-11-302

is not eligible for registration under §

7-11-302

;

With respect to a security sought to be registered under §

7-11-303

, there has been a failure to comply with the undertaking required by §

7-11-303

(b)(4); or

The applicant or registrant has failed to pay the proper filing fee; but the director may enter only a denial order under this subsection (a)(2)(vii) and vacate the order if the deficiency is corrected.

The director may not institute a stop order proceeding against an effective registration statement on the basis of a fact or transaction known to the director when the registration statement became effective unless the proceeding is begun within thirty (30) days after the registration statement became effective.

The director, by order under §

7-11-712

, may summarily postpone or suspend the effectiveness of the registration statement pending final determination of an administrative proceeding. As more fully set forth in §

7-11-712

upon the entry of the order, the director shall promptly notify each person specified in subsection (d) that the order has been entered and of the reasons for the postponement or suspension and that within thirty (30) days after the receipt of a written request from the person, the matter will be set down for hearing. If no hearing is requested and none is ordered by the director, the order remains in effect until it is modified or vacated by the director. If a hearing is requested or ordered, the director, after notice of an opportunity for hearing to each person specified in subsection (d), may modify or vacate the order or extend it until final determination.

No stop order may be entered under this section except subsection (c) without appropriate prior notice to the applicant or registrant, the issuer, and the person on whose behalf the securities are to be or have been offered, opportunity for hearing, and written findings of fact and conclusions of law in accordance with the state administrative procedures act.

The director may modify or vacate a stop order entered under this section if the director finds that the conditions which prompted entry have changed or that it is otherwise in the public interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 460, § 2.

7-11-307.
Federal covered securities.

The director may require by rule or order the filing of any or all of the following documents with respect to a covered security under § 18(b)(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77r(b)(2):

Prior to the initial offer of a federal covered security in this state, all documents that are part of a current federal registration statement filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission under the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq., or, in lieu of filing the registration statement, a notice as prescribed by the director by rule or otherwise, together with a consent to service of process signed by the issuer and with a nonrefundable fee of one-tenth of one percent (0.1%) of the maximum aggregate offering price at which the federal covered securities are to be offered in this state, but not less than three hundred dollars ($300) or more than one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($1,750).

An open end management company, a face amount certificate company, or a unit investment trust, as defined in the Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq., shall file a notice for an indefinite amount of securities. The issuer, at the time of filing, shall pay a nonrefundable fee of one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($1,750).

After the initial offer of the federal covered security in this state, all documents that are part of an amendment to a current federal registration statement filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission under the Securities Act of 1933, are filed concurrently with the director.

Unless otherwise extended by the director, an initial notice filing under subsection (a) or subsection (b) is effective for one year commencing upon the date the notice or registration statement, as applicable, is received by the director unless a later date is indicated by the issuer. A notice filing may be renewed by filing a renewal notice as prescribed by the director and paying a renewal fee of one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($1,750).

Regarding any security that is a covered security under § 18(b)(3) of the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77r(b)(3), unless the security is exempted by §

7-11-401

or is sold in an exempt transaction under §

7-11-402

, the issuer shall file a notice prior to the initial offer of such security in this state. Such notice filing shall include a uniform application adopted by the director, a consent to service of process, and the payment of a nonrefundable fee as prescribed in subsection (a)(1) of this section.

Regarding any security that is a covered security under § 18(b)(4)(D) of the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77r(b)(4)(D), the director may by rule or otherwise require the issuer to file a notice on SEC Form D and a consent to service of process signed by the issuer no later than fifteen (15) days after the first sale of the federal covered security in this state, together with Form U-2, Form D and a nonrefundable fee of three hundred dollars ($300).

The director may by rule or otherwise require the filing of any document filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission under the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq., with respect to a covered security under § 18(b)(3) or (4) of the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77r(b)(3) or (4), together with a notice and fees as defined in subsection (a)(1).

The director may issue a stop order suspending the offer and sale of a federal covered security, except a covered security under § 18(b)(1) of the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77r(b)(1), if the director finds that (1) the order is in the public interest and (2) there is a failure to comply with any condition established under this section.

The director may by rule or order waive any or all of the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 69, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 24, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 7, § 1.